District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0441.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Let Our Vows Endure Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. Chapter Forty-Three of An Act To establish a code of law for the District of
Columbia, approved March 3, 1901 (31 Stat. 1391; D.C. Official Code § 46-401 et seq.), is
amended by adding a new Section 1297a to read as follows:

“Sec. 1297a. Authority of Mayor to issue marriage licenses.
“(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the Mayor shall be authorized to
issue marriage licenses and authorize officiants during a period of time when the Clerk of the
Superior Court of the District of Columbia (“Clerk”) is not issuing marriage licenses because of
a total or partial federal government shutdown.
“(b)(1) During a period when the Clerk is not issuing marriage licenses because of a total
or partial federal government shutdown, the Mayor shall perform the duties delegated to the
Clerk under sections 1288(a)(4), 1291, 1292, 1293, and 1295.
“(2)(A) The Mayor shall create a form for a license to perform a marriage
ceremony that is consistent with the form set forth in section 1293; except, that such a form shall
be modified by replacing the references to “Clerk’s Office of the Superior Court of the District of
Columbia”, “Court”, “Clerk”, “Assistant Clerk”, and “Clerk of the Superior Court of the District
of Columbia” with appropriate references to the Mayor or to an office or officer within the
executive branch of the government of the District of Columbia; provided, that the form may
require that the license be returned to one or either of:
“(i) The Clerk’s Office of the Superior Court of the District
of Columbia; or
“(ii) The Mayor or to an office or officer within the
executive branch of the government of the District of Columbia.
“(B) The Mayor shall issue the form for a license described in
subparagraph (A) of this paragraph to persons authorized by section 1288 to perform a marriage
ceremony when authorized to issue a license.
“(3)(A) The Mayor shall maintain:


“(i) A true and accurate copy of each marriage license
issued by the Mayor affixed with a seal;
“(ii) Each marriage license certificate returned to the
Mayor by a minister, magistrate, or other person authorized by section 1288 to perform or
witness a marriage ceremony;
“(iii) A record book filled with the names and residences
of the parties for whose marriage any license has been issued by the Mayor; and
“(iv) A record book filled with the names of each
minister, magistrate, or other person authorized by section 1288 to perform or witness a marriage
ceremony (“officiant”) who has returned a marriage license certificate to the Mayor and the
license number of each marriage license certificate returned by the officiant.
“(B) A copy of each license and marriage license certificate so
kept and recorded, certified by the Mayor, shall be competent evidence of the marriage.
“(C) The Mayor shall number each marriage license consecutively,
from one upward, and with an alphabetical prefix to such number to distinguish each license
issued by the Mayor from licenses issued by the Clerk of the Superior Court of the District of
Columbia.
“(D)(i) Within 5 business days after a marriage license is issued by
the Mayor or a marriage license certificate is returned to the Mayor by a minister, magistrate, or
other person authorized by section 1288 to perform or witness a marriage ceremony, the Mayor
shall transmit to the Clerk of the Superior Court of the District of Columbia a true and accurate
copy of the marriage license or marriage license certificate.


“(ii) A copy of each license and marriage license
certificate so transmitted, as maintained and certified by the Clerk, shall be competent evidence
of the marriage.”.
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect after approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).